Wisconsin, session 2025, AB798.
do enact as follows:AB798,13Section 1. 343.178 of the statutes is created to read:AB798,1,44343.178 Caregiver information. (1) In this section:AB798,2,11(a) “Caregiver” has the meaning given in s. 46.90 (1) (an).AB798,2,22(b) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.83 (1) (b).AB798,2,163(2) As part of every application for an original, duplicate, reinstated, reissued, 4or renewal license or endorsement, the department shall inquire whether the 5applicant wants to provide names and contact information for not more than 3 6individuals for whom the applicant is the primary caregiver. The department shall 7make available on its website and at each local examining center a separate form on 8which an applicant may provide the contact information. If an applicant provides 9contact information under this section, the department shall record the information 10in its file for the person. The department shall provide a method for a law 11enforcement agency that reasonably identifies a person to electronically request 12and automatically receive the information recorded in the person’s file under this 13section and any emergency contact information recorded in the person’s file under 14s. 343.177. The department may not disclose any information provided by an 15applicant under this section to any person except the applicant or a law 16enforcement agency as provided in this section.AB798,217Section 2. 343.50 (4r) of the statutes is created to read:AB798,2,1818343.50 (4r) Caregiver information. (a) In this subsection:AB798,2,19191. “Caregiver” has the meaning given in s. 46.90 (1) (an).AB798,2,20202. “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.83 (1) (b).AB798,3,1021(b) As part of every application for an identification card, the department 22shall inquire whether the applicant wants to provide names and contact 23information for not more than 3 individuals for whom the applicant is the primary 24caregiver. The department shall make available on its website and at each local 1examining center a separate form on which an applicant may provide the contact 2information. If an applicant provides contact information under this subsection, 3the department shall record the information in its file for the person. The 4department shall provide a method for a law enforcement agency that reasonably 5identifies a person to electronically request and automatically receive the 6information recorded in the person’s file under this subsection and any emergency 7contact information recorded in the person’s file under s. 343.177. The department 8may not disclose any information provided by an applicant under this subsection to 9any person except the applicant or a law enforcement agency as provided in this 10subsection.AB798,3,1111